Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2991.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Title 42 of the General Laws entitled "STATE AFFAIRS AND
GOVERNMENT" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 56.4
THE BODY CAMERAS FOR CORRECTIONAL FACILITIES ACT
42-56.4-1. Short title.
This act shall be known and may be cited as "The Willie Washington, Jr. Act".
42-56.4-2. Definitions.
The following words shall have the following meanings in this chapter:
(1) "Body camera" means a portable video recording device worn by correctional staff to
capture incidents occurring in real-time within correctional facilities.
(2) "Incarcerated individuals" means any person held in custody within a facility operated
by the department of corrections.
(3) "Staff" means employees or contractors of the department of corrections, including
correctional officers, supervisors, and administrators.
42-56.4-3. Body camera requirements.
(a) All correctional staff assigned to direct supervision roles shall wear body cameras while
on duty within the facilities.
(b) Staff shall activate body cameras during interactions with incarcerated individuals

including, but not limited to:
(1) Use of force incidents;
(2) Transporting individuals;
(3) Medical emergencies; and
(4) Disciplinary proceedings.
(c) Cameras shall record continuously during the aforementioned interactions and shall
only be deactivated once the situation is resolved and no further actions are anticipated.
42-56.4-4. Data access and retention.
(a) Recordings shall be retained for a minimum of sixty (60) days, after which the recording
shall be securely deleted unless required for an ongoing investigation or legal proceeding.
(b) Access to recordings is strictly limited to authorized personnel including investigators,
supervisors, and legal counsel as necessary.
(c) Incarcerated individuals shall be informed through posted notices regarding the use of
body cameras within the facility. When practical, individuals shall be notified if recording is
occurring at the time of the incident. Individuals shall have the right to request review of footage
that directly involves the individual under appropriate circumstances.
42-56.4-5. Accountability and oversight.
(a) The department of corrections shall establish an independent board pursuant to the
provisions of subsection (b) of this section to oversee the review of recorded incidents involving
use of force, complaints against staff, or other critical incidents involving incarcerated individuals.
(b) An independent incident oversight board (IIOB) shall be established, consisting of
members appointed by key stakeholders, including representatives from civil rights organizations,
legal experts, mental health professionals, formerly incarcerated individuals, and community
leaders.
(c) The IIOB shall:
(1) Oversee the review of recorded incidents involving use of force, complaints against
staff, or other critical incidents involving incarcerated individuals and investigate the complaints
and incidents;
(2) Conduct periodic assessments and audits of facility operations, policies, and practices;
and
(3) Provide recommendations for improvements and reforms to the department of
corrections based on findings.
42-56.4-6. Reporting requirement -- Training -- Non-compliance.
(a) The department of corrections shall provide biannual reports to the general assembly
LC003391 - Page 2 of 4

detailing the number of incidents recorded, access requests made by incarcerated individuals, and
incidents reviewed by the incident review board.
(b) Comprehensive training shall be provided to all staff on the proper use of body cameras,
data privacy, and the importance of maintaining the dignity and rights of incarcerated individuals.
(c) Any staff who fail to comply with body camera policies established in this chapter shall
face disciplinary actions up to and including termination of employment, as well as potential civil
liabilities.
(d) The department of corrections shall conduct regular audits to ensure compliance with
the provisions of this chapter and assess the effectiveness of body camera utilization.
42-56.4-7. Implementation.
The department shall implement and establish the necessary protocol and training programs
within six (6) months after the effective date of this chapter.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003391
========
LC003391 - Page 3 of 4